Hawaii statutes.
§304A-3005 Research corporation excepted
from certain state laws. To carry out the purposes and objectives of the
research corporation, including the conduct of research and training projects,
the research corporation shall be granted flexibility in hiring its personnel
and in handling and disbursing moneys by being excepted from the following
state laws:

(1) Sections 36-27 and 36-30, relating to special
fund reimbursements to the state general fund;

(2) Chapter 103D, relating to advertising for bids and
purchases to be made in Hawaii whenever public moneys are expended;

(3) Chapter 103D with respect to construction
contracts; provided that the exception shall not apply where state funds are
used and compliance with chapter 103D is required by a bill enacted by the
legislature;

(4) Chapter 76, relating to civil service; and

(5) Section 78-1, relating to public employment. [L
2006, c 75, pt of §2; am L 2013, c 288, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next